Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.910

Construction—1983 c 169.

This chapter, being necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect its purposes. Insofar as the provisions of this chapter are inconsistent with the provisions of any general or special law, or parts thereof, the provisions of this chapter shall be controlling.

[ 1983 c 169 s 16.]